interface/bpy-Qaaa-x-BIPA/bpy-Qaaa-x-BIPA.lexd
PATTERNS
misc

LEXICON misc
<misc>:runɟit
<misc>:kumar
<misc>:siŋa
<misc>:te
<misc>:nejta
<misc>:bopko
<misc>:bacʰa
<misc>:baʃak
<misc>:kuraŋow
<misc>:bula
<misc>:sulata
<misc>:konak
<misc>:kʰulata
<misc>:hatgo
<misc>:ɟepej
<misc>:babrue
<misc>:opej
<misc>:anloga
<misc>:na
